Missouri, session 2026, HB3309.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 167, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 167.075, to read as follows:
167.075. 1. No student shall establish, organize, or participate in any protest
activity on or off the property of a public school during regularly scheduled
instructional periods of learning if such activity materially and substantially disrupts
the public school's operations.
2. No person shall:
(1) Knowingly disrupt or interfere with the lawful administration or functions of
a public school or activity on school property in this state;
(2) Knowingly advise, counsel, or instruct any student or school employee to
disrupt any school or school function, activity on school property, or classroom;
(3) Knowingly interfere with the attendance of any student or school employee in
a school or classroom; or
(4) Conspire to riot or to engage in any school campus or school function
disruption or disturbance that interferes with the educational processes or with the
orderly conduct of a school campus, school, or school function or activity on school
property.

EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3309 2
This subsection shall apply to all public schools and functions or activities on school
property; however, nothing in this subsection shall deny public school employees the
opportunity to exercise their rights under state or federal law.
3. Consequences for students, teachers, and school districts or charter schools
shall include, but are not limited to, the following:
(1) Students who leave a scheduled instructional period without authorization to
participate in a protest activity or demonstration shall be marked absent from school;
(2) Teachers who facilitate walkouts shall be subject to an investigation and
sanctions, including licensure revocation; and
(3) School districts or charter schools that allow, encourage, or facilitate
walkouts shall be at risk of losing daily attendance funding and shall be subject to an
investigation and sanctions.
4. Students in public schools retain the right to free expression consistent with
the First Amendment to the Constitution of the United States and Article I, Section 8 of
the Constitution of Missouri.
5. A school district or charter school may adopt and enforce content-neutral
policies governing the time, place, and manner of student expression, including protest
activities, provided that such policies are reasonably related to legitimate pedagogical
concerns and the orderly operation of the district or school.
6. No student shall be disciplined solely for engaging in peaceful expression
unless the student's conduct:
(1) Materially and substantially disrupts the work and discipline of the school;
(2) Infringes upon the rights of other students or school personnel; or
(3) Violates content-neutral time, place, and manner restrictions.
7. Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(1) Prohibit voluntary, nondisruptive student expression that occurs outside
scheduled instructional time;
(2) Limit lawful activities protected under state or federal law; or
(3) Authorize the suppression of expression based on viewpoint.
✔